Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 11 Preparation for and Conduct of Primaries and Elections

Cross references.

Penalties for offenses relating to access of electors to polling places, or marking of ballots, §

21-2-566

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).